Hawaii statutes.
§663-12 Right of contribution; accrual; pro
rata share. [(a)] The right of contribution exists among joint
tortfeasors.

[(b)] A joint tortfeasor is not entitled to a
money judgment for contribution until the joint tortfeasor has by payment
discharged the common liability or has paid more than the joint tortfeasor's
pro rata share thereof.

[(c)] A joint tortfeasor who enters into a
settlement with the injured person is not entitled to recover contribution from
another joint tortfeasor whose liability to the injured person is not
extinguished by the settlement.

[(d)] When there is such a disproportion of
fault among joint tortfeasors as to render inequitable an equal distribution
among them of the common liability by contribution, the relative degrees of
fault of the joint tortfeasors shall be considered in determining their pro
rata shares, subject to section 663-17. [L 1941, c 24, §2; RL 1945, §10488; RL
1955, §246-11; HRS §663-12; am L 1972, c 144, §2(g); gen ch 1985]

Law Journals and Reviews

Keeping the (Good) Faith: Hawai‘i's Good Faith Settlement
After HRS Section 15.5 and Troyer v. Adams. 26 UH L. Rev. 275 (2003).

Case Notes

Right of contribution, ripens when. 283 F. Supp. 854 (1968).

Settlement did not bar defendant's contribution rights
against State where settlement extinguished State's liability to plaintiffs;
apportionment of fault where negligent employee, acting for both joint
tortfeasors, performed services primarily benefiting one tortfeasor. 643 F.
Supp. 593 (1986).

Party was not allowed to recover as a joint tortfeasor. 682
F. Supp. 1499 (1988).

Cited, where a defendant filed a motion for summary judgment
against plaintiff's claims and filed cross-claims against co-defendants, who
filed an opposition to the motion, but did not file a cross-claim against the
defendant, and plaintiff filed a statement of no position regarding the motion;
the court found the right of the co-defendants to oppose the motion was
sustainable under the Uniform Contribution Among Tortfeasors Act and HRCP rule 15(b).
415 F. Supp. 2d 1163 (2006).

In reviewing apportionment of damages, supreme court should
confine its question to whether apportionment was so erroneous as to shock the
moral sense. 45 H. 128, 363 P.2d 969 (1961).

A party who settles before suit and is found not negligent in
action for contribution is not a joint tortfeasor and is therefore not entitled
to contribution but may recover under subrogation. 53 H. 398, 495 P.2d 585
(1972).

Based on §663-17(c) and this section, because joint
tortfeasor landlord did not file a cross-claim against joint tortfeasor tenant,
landlord did not have a right of contribution from tenant, and trial court
properly acted within its discretion in dismissing tenant from the case. 93 H.
417, 5 P.3d 407 (2000).

Where bar owners failed to litigate the issue of
proportionate fault with bar customer by pleading the customer into the case by
filing a third-party complaint against the customer pursuant to this section,
under §663-17(c), the bar owners were barred from having "the relative
degrees of fault of the joint tortfeasors considered in determining their pro
rata shares"; thus, because the customer could not have been included on
the special verdict form as a matter of law, the appeals court erred in
concluding to the contrary. 118 H. 385, 191 P.3d 1062 (2008).

Form of final judgment with respect to joint tortfeasor's
claim for contribution. 6 H. App. 664, 737 P.2d 871 (1987).

Condominium association jointly and severally liable with
murderer under this section as section provides for apportionment of the common
liability of joint tortfeasors as among themselves but does not affect the
joint and several liability of each defendant toward plaintiff. 87 H. 273
(App.), 954 P.2d 652 (1998).

When conduct of all joint tortfeasors is not sufficiently
culpable to justify award of punitive damages against each tortfeasor, such
damages may not be the subject of contribution among joint tortfeasors. 87 H.
273 (App.), 954 P.2d 652 (1998).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next